Arkansas, session 2025, HB1853.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-42-316 is amended to read as follows:
17-42-316. Agency relationship and duties generally.
(a) The common law of agency under Arkansas as supplemented by this
section applies to the relationship between a licensee and the licensee's
client.
(b)(1)(A) In Except as provided under subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this
section, in accepting employment by a client, a licensee pledges a primary
duty of absolute fidelity to protect and promote the interests of the client
or clients.
(B) Multiple clients who are represented by the licensee
and have consented to dual agency may contractually waive the primary duty of
absolute fidelity of the licensee under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this
section.
(2) The licensee's duty includes without limitation the
*LGL110*
03/19/2025 12:04:35 PM LGL110

HB1853
obligation to:
(A) Use reasonable efforts to further the interest of the
client;
(B) Exercise reasonable skill and care in representing the
client and carrying out the responsibilities of the agency relationship;
(C) Perform the terms of the written agency agreement;
(D) Follow lawful instructions of the client unless doing
so would expose the licensee to liability from another party to a contract,
lease, or rental agreement;
(E) Perform all duties specified in this section in a
manner that demonstrates loyalty to the interests of the client;
(F) Comply with all requirements of this section and other
applicable statutes and rules;
(G) Disclose to the client material facts of the
transaction that the licensee is aware of or should be aware of in the
exercise of reasonable skill and care and that are not confidential
information under a current or prior agency or dual agency relationship;
(H) Advise the client to obtain expert advice concerning
material matters when necessary or appropriate;
(I) Account in a timely manner for all moneys and property
received in which the client has or may have an interest;
(J)(i) Keep confidential all confidential information
Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2)(J)(ii) of this section, refrain from
disclosing any confidential information.
(ii) The disclosure of confidential information may
be limited by contract when a licensee is an authorized dual agent under
subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section, including without limitation
confidential information from or concerning the client that may materially
compromise the negotiating position of the client, unless disclosure is
required by law or is authorized in writing by the client; and
(K) Refrain from disclosing confidential information to a
licensee who is not an agent of the client.
(c) The Except as provided in subsection (b)(1)(B) and subdivision
(b)(2)(J)(ii) of this section, the duties required of a licensee under this
section may not be waived by a client.

03/19/2025 12:04:35 PM LGL110